Nebraska, session 109, LB1140.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1140 LB1140
2026 2026
Section 1. Laws 2025, LB261, section 54, is amended to read:
Sec. 54. AGENCY NO. 13 — STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Program No. 351 - Vocational Rehabilitation
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 6,561,850 6,724,525
CASH FUND 557,883 571,719
FEDERAL FUND est. 30,807,902 31,596,542
PROGRAM TOTAL 37,927,635 38,892,786
SALARY LIMIT 15,709,139 16,203,613
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$49,289 General Funds and $8,560,706 Federal Funds estimate for state
aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is included in the
appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $49,289 General Funds and
$8,560,706 Federal Funds estimate for state aid, which shall only be used
for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$500,000 General Funds to be used for a multi-trade preapprenticeship
pilot program serving young adults and preparing them for registered
apprenticeships and entry-level construction employment within a city of
the metropolitan class.
It is the intent of the Legislature that the Division of
Rehabilitation Services of the State Department of Education and the
Division of Developmental Disabilities of the Department of Health and
Human Services work collaboratively to focus on employment for
individuals with disabilities and to maximize federal matching funds in
compliance with the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and
the federal Home and Community-Based Services Final Rule.
Sec. 2. Original Laws 2025, LB261, section 54, is repealed.
-2-